Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB436.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 281A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license shall be marked "commercial driver's license" and
"CDL" and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof. It shall
include but is not limited to the following information:
(a) The name and present resident address of the licensee;
(b) The licensee's photograph;
(c) A physical description of the licensee including sex, height, weight, and eye
color;
(d) The licensee's date of birth;
(e) The licensee's signature;
(f) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that the person is
authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions;
(g) The name of this state;
(h) The dates between which the license is valid; and
(i) Any other information required by the cabinet, except for a person's Social
Security number.
(2) A commercial driver's license issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation
that either:
(a) The commercial driver's license is a voluntary travel ID identity document
that complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13,
Title II, and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or
(b) The commercial driver's license shall not be used for federal identification
purposes.
(3) A commercial driver's license shall be issued with classifications, endorsements,
and restrictions. Vehicles that require an endorsement shall not be driven unless the
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 1:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1564
proper endorsement appears on the license and the applicant has passed the
knowledge and skills test required by the State Police.
(a) Classifications:
1. Class A - Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, if the
gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is in excess of ten
thousand (10,000) pounds. Licensees with an "A" classification may
with the proper endorsement drive Class B and C vehicles;
2. Class B - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of
twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, and any vehicle
towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross
vehicle weight rating. Licensees with a "B" classification may with the
proper endorsements drive Class C vehicles;
3. Class C - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less
than twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or any vehicle
towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten
thousand (10,000) pounds which includes:
a. Vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers,
including the driver; or
b. Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which
requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 C.F.R. secs. 172.500
to 172.560, as adopted by administrative regulations of the
cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
4. Class D - All other vehicles not listed in any other class, including
mopeds; and
5. Class M - Motorcycles. Licensees with a "M" classification may also
drive mopeds.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 1:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1564
(b) Endorsements:
1. "H" - Authorizes the driver to operate a vehicle transporting hazardous
materials;
2. "T" - Authorizes operation of double trailers and triple trailers in those
jurisdictions allowing the operation of triple trailers;
3. "P" - Authorizes operation of vehicles carrying passengers;
4. "N" - Authorizes operation of tank vehicles;
5. "X" - Authorizes operation of combination of hazardous materials and
tank vehicle endorsements;
6. "R" - Authorizes operation of all other endorsements not otherwise
specified; and
7. "S" - Authorizes operation of school buses.
(c) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to outline restrictions on the operation of
commercial vehicles and the associated codes to identify such restrictions,
which shall appear on the face of the commercial driver's license.
(4) Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver's license, the cabinet shall
notify the commercial driver's license information system of that fact, providing all
information required to ensure identification of the person.
(5) A commercial driver's license issued to a resident pursuant to this chapter shall
expire in eight (8) years unless the license was issued to a resident under the age of
twenty-one (21).
(6) A person under the age of twenty-one (21):
(a) Shall not be:
1. Licensed to operate a Class A, B, or C vehicle unless he or she has a "K"
restriction; or
2. Allowed to operate a school bus; and
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 1:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1564
(b) Who holds a valid CDL may be issued a hazardous materials endorsement
to transport hazardous materials in intrastate commerce.
(7) A commercial driver with a "K" restriction shall not drive a commercial motor
vehicle in interstate commerce, unless he or she is exempt pursuant to 49 C.F.R.
sec. 391.2[. A commercial driver under the age of twenty-one (21) shall not be
allowed to operate a school bus or a vehicle transporting hazardous material in
intrastate commerce].
(8)[(7)] The holder of a commercial driver's license shall be considered to hold a valid
Kentucky driver's license issued under the provisions of KRS 186.4102 and
186.412.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/7/2025 1:12 PM Jacketed